fi: Yhteensopiva symbaalin koko: 10 in; 12 in; 13 in; 14 in; 15 in; 16 in; 17 in; 18 in; 19 in; 20 in; 21 in; 22 in; 23 in; 24 in; Muu
pl: Zgodny rozmiar talerza perkusyjnego: 10 cali; 12 cali; 13 cali; 14 cali; 15 cali; 16 cali; 17 cali; 18 cali; 19 cali; 20 cali; 21 cali; 22 cali; 23 cali; 24 cali; Inne
sk-SK: Kompatibilná veľkosť činela: 10 palcov; 12 palcov; 13 palcov; 14 palcov; 15 palcov; 16 palcov; 17 palcov; 18 palcov; 19 palcov; 20 palcov; 21 palcov; 22 palcov; 23 palcov; 24 palcov; Iné
th: ขนาดฉาบที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: 10 นิ้ว; 12 นิ้ว; 13 นิ้ว; 14 นิ้ว; 15 นิ้ว; 16 นิ้ว; 17 นิ้ว; 18 นิ้ว; 19 นิ้ว; 20 นิ้ว; 21 นิ้ว; 22 นิ้ว; 23 นิ้ว; 24 นิ้ว; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 适用镲片尺寸: 10 英寸; 12 英寸; 13 英寸; 14 英寸; 15 英寸; 16 英寸; 17 英寸; 18 英寸; 19 英寸; 20 英寸; 21 英寸; 22 英寸; 23 英寸; 24 英寸; 其他
cs: Vhodná velikost činelů: 10 in; 12 in; 13 in; 14 in; 15 in; 16 in; 17 in; 18 in; 19 in; 20 in; 21 in; 22 in; 23 in; 24 in; Jiné
sl-SI: Združljiva velikost činel: 10 in; 12 in; 13 in; 14 in; 15 in; 16 in; 17 in; 18 in; 19 in; 20 in; 21 in; 22 in; 23 in; 24 in; Drugo
en: Compatible cymbal size: 10 in; 12 in; 13 in; 14 in; 15 in; 16 in; 17 in; 18 in; 19 in; 20 in; 21 in; 22 in; 23 in; 24 in; Other
pt-BR: Tamanho de címbalo compatível: 10 pol; 12 pol; 13 pol; 14 pol; 15 pol; 16 pol; 17 pol; 18 pol; 19 pol; 20 pol; 21 pol; 22 pol; 23 pol; 24 pol; Outro
hu: Kompatibilis cintányér-méret: 10 in; 12 in; 13 in; 14 in; 15 in; 16 in; 17 in; 18 in; 19 in; 20 in; 21 in; 22 in; 23 in; 24 in; Egyéb
lt-LT: Suderinamo dydžio būgnų lėkštės: 10 col.; 12 col.; 13 col.; 14 col.; 15 col.; 16 col.; 17 col.; 18 col.; 19 col.; 20 col.; 21 col.; 22 col.; 23 col.; 24 col.; Kita
fr: Dimensions compatibles des cymbales: 10 po; 12 po; 13 po; 14 po; 15 po; 16 po; 17 po; 18 po; 19 po; 20 po; 21 po; 22 po; 23 po; 24 po; Autre
pt-PT: Tamanho de prato compatível: 10 pol.; 12 pol.; 13 pol.; 14 pol.; 15 pol.; 16 pol.; 17 pol.; 18 pol.; 19 pol.; 20 pol.; 21 pol.; 22 pol.; 23 pol.; 24 pol.; Outro
sv: Kompatibel cymbalstorlek: 10 tum; 12 tum; 13 tum; 14 tum; 15 tum; 16 tum; 17 tum; 18 tum; 19 tum; 20 tum; 21 tum; 22 tum; 23 tum; 24 tum; Annat
ro-RO: Dimensiune cimbale compatibilă: 10 in; 12 in; 13 in; 14 in; 15 in; 16 in; 17 in; 18 in; 19 in; 20 in; 21 in; 22 in; 23 in; 24 in; Altele
zh-TW: 相容鈸尺寸: 10 吋; 12 吋; 13 吋; 14 吋; 15 吋; 16 吋; 17 吋; 18 吋; 19 吋; 20 吋; 21 吋; 22 吋; 23 吋; 24 吋; 其他
ru: Совместимый размер тарелок: 10 дюймов; 12 дюймов; 13 дюймов; 14 дюймов; 15 дюймов; 16 дюймов; 17 дюймов; 18 дюймов; 19 дюймов; 20 дюймов; 21 дюймов; 22 дюйма; 23 дюйма; 24 дюйма; Другое
tr: Uyumlu zil boyutu: 10 inç; 12 inç; 13 inç; 14 inç; 15 inç; 16 inç; 17 inç; 18 inç; 19 inç; 20 inç; 21 inç; 22 inç; 23 inç; 24 inç; Diğer
ko: 호환 심벌즈 크기: 10인치; 12인치; 13인치; 14인치; 15인치; 16인치; 17인치; 18인치; 19인치; 20인치; 21인치; 22인치; 23인치; 24인치; 기타
ja: 対応シンバルサイズ: 10インチ; 12インチ; 13インチ; 14インチ; 15インチ; 16インチ; 17インチ; 18インチ; 19インチ; 20インチ; 21インチ; 22インチ; 23インチ; 24インチ; その他
hr-HR: Kompatibilna veličina činele: 10 in; 12 in; 13 in; 14 in; 15 in; 16 in; 17 in; 18 in; 19 in; 20 in; 21 in; 22 in; 23 in; 24 in; Ostalo
it: Taglia del piatto compatibile: 10 in; 12 in; 13 in; 14 in; 15 in; 16 in; 17 in; 18 in; 19 in; 20 in; 21 in; 22 in; 23 in; 24 in; Altra
el: Συμβατό μέγεθος κυμβάλου: 10 in; 12 in; 13 in; 14 in; 15 in; 16 in; 17 in; 18 in; 19 in; 20 in; 21 in; 22 in; 23 in; 24 in; Άλλο
da: Kompatibel bækkenstørrelse: 10 tommer; 12 tommer; 13 tommer; 14 tommer; 15 tommer; 16 tommer; 17 tommer; 18 tommer; 19 tommer; 20 tommer; 21 tommer; 22 tommer; 23 tommer; 24 tommer; Andet
vi: Kích thước chũm chọe tương thích: 10 inch; 12 inch; 13 inch; 14 inch; 15 inch; 16 inch; 17 inch; 18 inch; 19 inch; 20 inch; 21 inch; 22 inch; 23 inch; 24 inch; Khác
nb: Kompatibel symbalstørrelse: 10 tommer; 12 tommer; 13 tommer; 14 tommer; 15 tommer; 16 tommer; 17 tommer; 18 tommer; 19 tommer; 20 tommer; 21 tommer; 22 tommer; 23 tommer; 24 tommer; Annet
de: Kompatible Beckengröße: 10 Zoll; 12 Zoll; 13 Zoll; 14 Zoll; 15 Zoll; 16 Zoll; 17 Zoll; 18 Zoll; 19 Zoll; 20 Zoll; 21 Zoll; 22 Zoll; 23 Zoll; 24 Zoll; Sonstige
nl: Compatibele bekkenmaat: 10 inch; 12 inch; 13 inch; 14 inch; 15 inch; 16 inch; 17 inch; 18 inch; 19 inch; 20 inch; 21 inch; 22 inch; 23 inch; 24 inch; Overig
bg-BG: Съвместим размер на чинела: 10 инча; 12 инча; 13 инча; 14 инча; 15 инча; 16 инча; 17 инча; 18 инча; 19 инча; 20 инча; 21 инча; 22 инча; 23 инча; 24 инча; Друго
es: Tamaño de platillos compatible: 10 pulg.; 12 pulg.; 13 pulg.; 14 pulg.; 15 pulg.; 16 pulg.; 17 pulg.; 18 pulg.; 19 pulg.; 20 pulg.; 21 pulg.; 22 pulg.; 23 pulg.; 24 pulg.; Otro